el: Τύπος αισθητήρα κάμερας: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Άλλο
tr: Kamera sensörü türü: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Canlı MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Diğer
sv: Kamerasensortyp: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Annat
de: Art des Kamerasensors: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI-CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R-CMOS; Exmor RS-CMOS; Foveon; Live-MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super-CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Sonstiges
cs: Typ snímače fotoaparátu: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Jiné
ru: Тип матрицы камеры: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Другое
th: ประเภทเซนเซอร์กล้อง: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; เซนเซอร์โฟวีออน; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; ซูเปอร์ซีซีดี; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di sensore della fotocamera: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta senzora fotoaparata/videokamere: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-Trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de sensor da câmara: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-Trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Outro
nb: Kamerasensortype: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Annen
nl: Type camerasensor: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R-CMOS; Exmor RS-CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Andere
fi: Kameran anturityyppi: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Muu
da: Kamerasensortype: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta senzorja kamere: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Drugo
hu: Kameraérzékelő típusa: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de sensor da câmera: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Outro
sk-SK: Typ snímača fotoaparátu: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Iné
fr: Type de capteur de caméra: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI-CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Autre
lt-LT: Fotoaparato jutiklio tipas: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; „Exmor R CMOS“; „Exmor RS CMOS“; „Foveon“; „Live MOS“; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; „Super CCD“; „X-trans CMOS 4“; sCMOS; Kita
en: Camera sensor type: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Other
pl: Typ czujnika aparatu: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Pozostałe
ko: 카메라 센서 유형: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; 포베온; 라이브 MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; 슈퍼 CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; 기타
bg-BG: Тип сензор на камерата: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Други
zh-TW: 相機感應器類型: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; 超級感光耦合元件; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; 其他
es: Tipo de sensor de cámara: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Súper CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Otros
zh-CN: 相机传感器类型: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; 超级感光耦合元件; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; 其他
ja: カメラセンサーの種類: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; エクスモア R CMOS; エクスモア RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; スーパーCCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; その他
ro-RO: Tip senzor cameră video: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Altele
vi: Loại cảm biến máy ảnh: 3CMOS; 3MOS; BSI; BSI CMOS; CCD; CMOS; CMOS II; CMOS III; EMCCD; Exmor R CMOS; Exmor RS CMOS; Cảm biến Foveon; Live MOS; MOS; MOS BSI; NMOS; Công nghệ Super CCD; X-trans CMOS 4; sCMOS; Khác